New York, session 2025-2026, S8456.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 404-ff to read as follows: 3 § 404-ff. Distinctive plates for members of the Seabee Veterans of 4 America. 1. Any member of the Seabee Veterans of America residing in 5 this state shall, upon request, be issued a license plate bearing the 6 Navy Seabee emblem. Application for said license plate shall be filed 7 with the commissioner in such form and detail as the commissioner shall 8 prescribe. 9 2. The distinctive plate authorized in this section shall be issued 10 upon proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the applicant is a 11 member of the Seabee Veterans of America. 12 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 13 in the same manner as other number plates upon the payment of the regu- 14 lar registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this 15 article, provided, however, that an additional one-time service charge 16 of ten dollars shall be charged for such plate. 17 § 2. Subdivision 1-a of section 404 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 18 added by chapter 105 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as follows: 19 1-a. The commissioner may issue special number plates to applicants 20 who are members of veterans organizations in the same manner as other 21 number plates are issued pursuant to this article. Such special number 22 plates shall be issued only upon (a) payment of a one-time service 23 charge of ten dollars in addition to the regular registration fee 24 prescribed by section four hundred one of this article, and (b) EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04640-01-5 S. 8456 2 1 submission of proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the appli- 2 cant is presently a member of the veterans organization for which such 3 plate is requested. Such membership shall be verified annually by the 4 applicant. Application for such plates shall be made in accordance with 5 regulations promulgated by the commissioner with respect to the issuance 6 of such plates. Provided, however, that nothing contained herein shall 7 be deemed to supersede the provisions of section four hundred four-d, 8 four hundred four-e, four hundred four-h, four hundred four-i, four 9 hundred four-j, four hundred four-k, four hundred four-p, four hundred 10 four-aa, [or] four hundred four-dd or four hundred four-ff of this arti- 11 cle. 12 § 3. 1. A distinctive plate established pursuant to section 404-ff of 13 the vehicle and traffic law as added by section one of this act shall 14 only be designed, produced and issued upon the delivery to the depart- 15 ment of motor vehicles of a surety bond in the amount of six thousand 16 dollars, which shall be executed by a surety company authorized by the 17 department of financial services to transact business in this state. 18 Provided, however, that if the commissioner of motor vehicles shall have 19 received prior to plate design, production and issuance at least two 20 hundred orders for such distinctive plate together with the additional 21 one-time service charge applicable to each such order, which shall be 22 non-refundable, no such surety bond shall be required. All service 23 charges collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited pursuant 24 to the provisions of section 404-oo of the vehicle and traffic law to 25 the credit of the department of motor vehicles distinctive plate devel- 26 opment fund established by section 95-g of the state finance law and 27 shall be used for the design, production, advertising and distribution 28 of distinctive license plates in accordance with such section 95-g. 29 2. If, upon the expiration of two years following the date upon which 30 distinctive plates in the series are first available for sale two 31 hundred or more sets of such plates are sold, a bond delivered pursuant 32 to this section shall be discontinued. If fewer than two hundred sets of 33 such plates are sold by such time, such department shall be entitled to 34 recover against the bond in an amount proportionate to such shortfall. 35 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 36 section one of this act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth 37 day after it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addi- 38 tion, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 39 the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to 40 be made and completed on or before such effective date.